Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Chapter 11

Living Wills

32-11-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Right to Natural Death Act.”

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 1.

Cross-References. Assisted suicide, §39-13-216.

Construction of adult protection provisions with right to Natural Death Law regarding medical care for terminally ill persons, §71-6-102.

Power of attorney for health care, right to die naturally, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-402.

Law Reviews.

A Time to Be Born and a Time to Die: Pregnancy and End-Of-Life Care, 50 Tenn. B.J. 28 (2014).

Constitutional Law — Cruzan v. Director, Missouri Department of Health: The Supreme Court Reposes the Right-to-Die Issue with the Individual States, 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 655 (1991).

Durable Power of Attorney for Health Care and Living Will (John K. Fockler), 31 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1995).

Helping Your Clients with End-of-Life Directives: Who Will Decide? (Charles M. Key), 42 Tenn B.J. 13 (2006).

Living Wills, Organ Donation, and Durable Powers of Attorney (John K. Fockler), 23 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 23 (1987).

Planning for Incompetency Made Difficult: Legislation Provides Traps for the Unwary (David E. Fowler), 28 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1992).

Termination of Life Support Systems for Minor Children: Evolving Legal Responses (John M. Scheb), 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1986).

The Constitutionality of Pregnancy Clauses in Living Will Statutes, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 1821 (1990).

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

Attorney General Opinions. Living wills executed prior to enactment of chapter, OAG 87-21, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 178 (1/30/87).

32-11-102. Legislative intent.

The general assembly declares it to be the law of the state that every person has the fundamental and inherent right to die naturally with as much dignity as circumstances permit and to accept, refuse, withdraw from, or otherwise control decisions relating to the rendering of the person's own medical care, specifically including palliative care and the use of extraordinary procedures and treatment. The general assembly further declares that it is in the public interest to facilitate recovery of organs and/or tissues for transplantation and to provide mechanisms for individuals to express their desire to donate their organs and/or tissues.

The general assembly does further empower the exercise of this right by written declaration, called a “living will,” as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 2; 1991, ch. 344, § 5.

32-11-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Competent person” means an individual who is able to understand and appreciate the nature and consequences of a decision to accept or refuse treatment;

“Declarant” means an individual who declares a living will under this chapter;

“Health care provider,” “health care facility” or “health facility” means a person, facility or institution licensed or authorized to provide health or medical care;

“Living will” means a written declaration, pursuant to this chapter, stating declarant's desires for medical care or noncare, including palliative care, and other related matters such as organ donation and body disposal;

“Medical care” includes any procedure or treatment rendered by a physician or health care provider designed to diagnose, assess or treat a disease, illness or injury. These include, but are not limited to: surgery; drugs; transfusions; mechanical ventilation; dialysis; cardiopulmonary resuscitation; artificial or forced feeding of nourishment, hydration or other basic nutrients, regardless of the method used; radiation therapy; or any other medical act designed for diagnosis, assessment or treatment or to sustain, restore or supplant vital body function. This part shall not be interpreted to allow the withholding or withdrawal of simple nourishment or fluids so as to condone death by starvation or dehydration unless the instrument that creates a living will or durable power of attorney for health care includes the following or substantially the following: “I authorize the withholding or withdrawal of artificially provided food, water or other nourishment or fluids”;

“Organ donation” means a procedure to recover vascular organs following a declaration of death pursuant to § 68-3-501(b)(2), but prior to removal from artificial support systems;

“Palliative care” includes any measure taken by a physician or health care provider designed primarily to maintain the patient's comfort. These also include, but are not limited to, sedatives and pain-killing drugs, nonartificial oral feeding, suction, hydration and hygienic care;

“Physician” means any person licensed or permitted to practice medical care under title 63, chapters 6 and 9;

“Terminal condition” means any disease, illness, injury or condition, including, but not limited to, a coma or persistent vegetative state, sustained by any human being, from which there is no reasonable medical expectation of recovery and that, as a medical probability, will result in the death of the human being, regardless of the use or discontinuance of medical treatment implemented for the purpose of sustaining life, or the life processes; and

“Tissue donation” means a procedure to recover tissue following a declaration of death pursuant to § 68-3-501(b)(1), and following removal from artificial support systems.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 3; 1991, ch. 167, § 1; 1991, ch. 344, §§ 1-4; 1992, ch. 951, § 10.

Cross-References. Assisted suicide, §39-13-216.

Attorney General Opinions. Tube feeding, OAG 87-21, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 178 (1/30/87).

32-11-104. Execution of declaration.

Any competent adult person may execute a declaration directing the withholding or withdrawal of medical care to the person, to become effective on loss of competency. The declaration must be in writing and signed by the principal. The declaration is valid if the principal's signature is either attested by a notary public with no witnesses or witnessed by two (2) witnesses without attestation by a notary public. A witness is a competent adult, who is not the agent, and at least one (1) of whom is not related to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption and would not be entitled to any portion of the estate of the principal upon the death of the principal under any will or codicil made by the principal existing at the time of execution of the declaration or by operation of law then existing. The declaration shall contain an attestation clause that attests to the witnesses' compliance with the requirements of this subsection (a). The declaration shall be substantially in the form established in § 32-11-105. It is the intent of the general assembly that this subsection (a) have retroactive application.

It is the responsibility of the declarant or someone acting on the declarant's behalf to deliver a copy of the living will or declaration to the attending physician and/or other concerned health care provider. An attending physician who is so notified shall make the declaration, or a copy of it, part of the declarant's medical record.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 4; 2007, ch. 8, § 4.

Cross-References. Power of attorney for health care, right to die naturally, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-402.

Attorney General Opinions. Witnessing of living wills, OAG 87-21, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 178 (1/30/87).

Notarization of signatures of witnesses to living wills, OAG 98-032, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (2/9/98).

32-11-105. Form of declaration.

The declaration may be substantially in the following form, but not to the exclusion of other written and clear expressions of intent to accept, refuse, or withdraw medical care:

LIVING WILL I, , willfully and voluntarily make known my desire that my dying shall not be artificially prolonged under the circumstances set forth below, and do hereby declare: If at any time I should have a terminal condition and my attending physician has determined there is no reasonable medical expectation of recovery and which, as a medical probability, will result in my death, regardless of the use or discontinuance of medical treatment implemented for the purpose of sustaining life, or the life process, I direct that medical care be withheld or withdrawn, and that I be permitted to die naturally with only the administration of medications or the performance of any medical procedure deemed necessary to provide me with comfortable care or to alleviate pain. ARTIFICIALLY PROVIDED NOURISHMENT AND FLUIDS: By checking the appropriate line below, I specifically: Authorize the withholding or withdrawal of artificially provided food, water or other nourishment or fluids. DO NOT authorize the withholding or withdrawal of artificially provided food, water or other nourishment or fluids. ORGAN DONOR CERTIFICATION: Notwithstanding my previous declaration relative to the withholding or withdrawal of life-prolonging procedures, if as indicated below I have expressed my desire to donate my organs and/or tissues for transplantation, or any of them as specifically designated herein, I do direct my attending physician, if I have been determined dead according to Tennessee Code Annotated, §68-3-501(b) , to maintain me on artificial support systems only for the period of time required to maintain the viability of and to remove such organs and/or tissues. By checking the appropriate line below, I specifically: Desire to donate my organs and/or tissues for transplantation. Desire to donate my (Insert specific organs and/or tissues for transplantation). DO NOT desire to donate my organs or tissues for transplantation. In the absence of my ability to give directions regarding my medical care, it is my intention that this declaration shall be honored by my family and physician as the final expression of my legal right to refuse medical care and accept the consequences of such refusal. The definitions of terms used herein shall be as set forth in the Tennessee Right to Natural Death Act, Tennessee Code Annotated, §32-11-103 . I understand the full import of this declaration, and I am emotionally and mentally competent to make this declaration. In acknowledgment whereof, I do hereinafter affix my signature on this the day of , 20 . Declarant We, the subscribing witnesses hereto, are personally acquainted with and subscribe our names hereto at the request of the declarant, an adult, whom we believe to be of sound mind, fully aware of the action taken herein and its possible consequence. We, the undersigned witnesses, further declare that we are not related to the declarant by blood or marriage; that we are not entitled to any portion of the estate of the declarant upon the declarant's decease under any will or codicil thereto presently existing or by operation of law then existing; that we are not the attending physician, an employee of the attending physician or a health facility in which the declarant is a patient; and that we are not persons who, at the present time, have a claim against any portion of the estate of the declarant upon the declarant's death. Witness Witness STATE OF TENNESSEE COUNTY OF Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by , the declarant, and subscribed and sworn to before me by and , witnesses, this day of , 20 . Notary Public My Commission Expires:

Click to view form.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 5; 1991, ch. 344, § 6.

Cross-References. Power of attorney for health care, right to die naturally, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Notarization of signatures of witnesses to living wills, OAG 98-032, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (2/9/98).

32-11-106. Revocation of declaration.

A declaration may be revoked at any time by the declarant, without regard to the declarant's mental state or competency, by any of the following methods, effectively communicated by the declarant to the attending physician or other concerned health care provider:

Written revocation by the declarant, dated and signed by the declarant.

By oral statement or revocation made by the declarant to the attending physician. This revocation shall be made a part of the declarant's medical record by the attending physician.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 6; 1991, ch. 344, § 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-402.

Law Reviews.

Neuronal Testimonial: Brain-Computer Interfaces and the Law, 71 Vand. L. Rev. 1365 (2018).

Attorney General Opinions. Revocation of declaration by incompetent, OAG 86-05, 1986 Tenn. AG LEXIS 213 (1/16/86).

32-11-107. Effective date of declaration — Subsequent declarations — Incapacitated declarants.

A declaration shall be effective from the date of its execution until revoked in a manner prescribed by this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a declarant from reexecuting a declaration at any time in accordance with the formalities of this chapter, including reexecution after a diagnosis of a terminal condition. If the declarant has executed more than one (1) declaration, then the latest declaration known to the attending physician shall take precedence. If the declarant becomes comatose or if the declarant's condition renders the declarant incapable of communicating with the attending physician, the declaration shall remain in effect during the comatose condition or until the declarant's condition renders the declarant able to communicate with the attending physician.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 7.

32-11-108. Compliance with declaration — Failure to comply — Liability and penalties.

Any physician or other individual health care provider who cannot in good conscience comply with the provisions of such a living will, on being informed of the declaration, shall so inform the declarant, or if the declarant is not competent, the declarant's next of kin or a legal guardian, and at their option make every reasonable effort to assist in the transfer of the patient to another physician who will comply with the declaration. Any health care provider who fails to make good faith reasonable efforts to comply with the preceding procedure as prescribed by the attending physician shall be civilly liable and subject to professional disciplinary action, including revocation or suspension of license. The health care provider shall not be subject to civil liability for medical care provided during the interim period until transfer is effectuated.

A physician or other health care provider who, by no fault of such physician as health care provider, has not received notice of a declaration, revocation, or other change shall not suffer civil, administrative, or criminal penalties under this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 8.

Law Reviews.

A Time to Be Born and a Time to Die: Pregnancy and End-Of-Life Care, 50 Tenn. B.J. 28 (2014).

Durable Powers of Attorney for Health Care Decisions (David E. Fowler), 27 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1991).

Liability for Improper Maintenance of Life Support: Balancing Patient and Physician Autonomy, 46 Vand. L. Rev. 1255 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Representation of incompetents, OAG 86-05, 1986 Tenn. AG LEXIS 213 (1/16/86).

32-11-109. Willful misconduct — Penalty.

Any person who willfully conceals, cancels, defaces, obliterates or damages the declaration or revocation of another without the declarant's consent, or who falsifies or forges the declaration or revocation of another shall be civilly liable and subject to criminal prosecution for a Class C misdemeanor, and if a provider, subject to administrative and professional discipline.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 9; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

32-11-110. Construction and effect of chapter — Signatures — Severability — Liability for complying with chapter.

The withholding or withdrawal of medical care from a declarant in accordance with this chapter shall not, for any purpose, constitute a suicide, euthanasia or homicide.

The making of a declaration pursuant to § 32-11-104 shall not affect in any manner the sale, procurement or issuance of any policy of life insurance, nor shall it be deemed to modify the terms of an existing policy of life insurance. No policy of life insurance shall be legally impaired or invalidated in any manner by withholding or withdrawal of medical care from an insured declarant.

No physician, health care facility or other health care provider, and no health care service plan, insurer issuing disability insurance, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or nonprofit hospital plan, shall require any person to execute a declaration as a condition for being insured for, or receiving, health care services.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair or supersede any legal right or legal responsibility that any person may have to effect the withholding or withdrawal of medical care in any lawful manner. In this respect, the provisions of this chapter are cumulative.

This chapter shall create no presumption concerning the intention of an individual who has not executed a declaration to consent to the use, withholding or withdrawal of medical care.

A competent declarant, unable to sign the declaration, may make a signature as provided in § 1-3-105.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

No physician or health facility that, acting in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, causes the withholding or withdrawal of medical care from a patient, shall be subject to civil liability therefrom. No health care provider, acting under the direction of a physician, who participates in the withholding or withdrawal of medical care in accordance with this chapter shall be subject to any civil liability. No physician, or health care provider acting under the direction of a physician, who participates in the withholding or withdrawal of medical care in accordance with this chapter shall be guilty of any criminal act or of unprofessional conduct.

No physician or health care provider shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or considered guilty of unprofessional conduct as a result of actions under this chapter that are in accord with reasonable medical standards or as a result of another physician's or health care provider's actions or failure to act in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 355, § 10; 1991, ch. 344, § 7.

Cross-References. Applicability of this section to power of attorney for health care provisions, §34-6-212.

Power of attorney for health care, life insurance unaffected, §34-6-213.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 86-05, 1986 Tenn. AG LEXIS 213 (1/16/86).

32-11-111. Living wills executed outside Tennessee — When effective.

A living will that is executed outside of this state by a nonresident of this state at the time of execution shall be given effect in this state if that living will is in compliance with either this chapter or the laws of the state of the declarant's residence.

Acts 1991, ch. 344, § 8.

32-11-112. Living wills executed before July 1, 1991 — When effective.

A living will executed before July 1, 1991, shall be effective if it was executed in compliance with this chapter as in effect on the date that living will was executed, notwithstanding that the living will does not comply with revisions to this chapter since that date.

Acts 1991, ch. 344, § 8.

32-11-113. Effect and interpretation of living wills.

A living will entered into before July 1, 2004, under this chapter shall be given effect and interpreted in accord with this chapter.

A living will entered into on or after July 1, 2004, that evidences an intent that it is entered into under this chapter shall be given effect and interpreted in accord with this chapter.

A living will entered into on or after July 1, 2004, that does not evidence an intent that it is entered into under this chapter may, if it complies with the Tennessee Health Care Decisions Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18, be given effect as an individual instruction under that act.

Acts 2004, ch. 862, § 4.